Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.165

Board may receive contributions from any source.

Contributions may be received by the Washington state patrol retirement board from any public or private source for deposit into the Washington state patrol retirement fund, and said contributions shall be dealt with in the same manner as other state patrol retirement funds and subject to the terms of the contribution.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.43.165. Prior: 1955 c 244 s 4.]